src/fst/stems/noninflecting_adjectives.lexc
@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Case.Short@täis+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Case.Short@t˘äis GI  "weight: 5 " ; 
täiskirjutatud+A:t˘äis%#kirjutatud GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
täitmata+A:t˘äitmata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
täppidega+A:t˘äppidega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@töllakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@töllakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@töllis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t˘ölʲlis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
töötlemata+A:t˘öötlemata GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
tühjavõitu+A:tühja%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@tükkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t˘ükkis GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
tüsedavõitu+A:tüseda%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
udukarva+A:udu%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@umbes+A:@P.Case.Ine@˘umbes GI  "weight: 5 " ; 
ummikus+A:ummikus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
unaruses+A:unaruses GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
unustuses+A:unustuses GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@upakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@upakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@uppis+A:@P.Case.Ine@˘uppis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@urvakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@urvakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@uurakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@uurakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vaesevõitu+A:v˘aese%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahakarva+A:vaha%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahelduseta+A:vahelduseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahetpidamata+A:vahet%#pidamata GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
valatud+A:valatud GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
valduses+A:v˘alduses GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
valgetverd+A:valget%#v˘erd GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
valikuta+A:valikuta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@valmis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v˘alʲmis GI  "weight: 5 " ; 
valvel+A:v˘alvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vanavõitu+A:vana%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
varesekarva+A:varese%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
varjamata+A:v˘arjamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vastamata+A:v˘astamata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
veekalkvel+A:v˘ee%#k˘alkvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
verevärvi+A:vere%#v˘ärvi GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vesiloodis+A:vesʲi%#l˘oodʲis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vidukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@vidukil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vidus+A:@P.Case.Ine@vidus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vigadega+A:vigadega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vigadeta+A:vigadeta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vigastamata+A:vigastamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vihavõitu+A:viha%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vihmata+A:vihmata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@viidakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@viidakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@viikis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v˘iikis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
viimistlemata+A:viimistlemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vikerkaarevärvi+A:viker%#kaare%#v˘ärvi GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vildakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@vildakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
viletsavõitu+A:viletsa%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@villis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v˘ilʲlis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vilumusteta+A:vilumusteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
viluvõitu+A:vilu%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vimmas+A:@P.Case.Ine@v˘immas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vines+A:@P.Case.Ine@vines GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vingus+A:@P.Case.Ine@v˘ingus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vinklis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v˘inklis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vinnas+A:@P.Case.Ine@v˘innas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vinnis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v˘inʲnis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vintis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v˘inʲtis GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@virevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@virevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vissis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v˘isʲsis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vitsavaevas+A:vitsa%#vaevas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@voltis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v˘olʲtis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vormis+A:@P.Case.Ine@vormis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@vurhvis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v˘urhvis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
võimeteta+A:võimeteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
võitu+A:v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
võltsimata+A:võlʲtsimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
vähemtuntud+A:vähem%#t˘untud GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
väiksevõitu+A:v˘äikse%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
väljaarenemata+A:v˘älʲja%#arenemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
väljasirutatud+A:v˘älʲja%#sirutatud GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
väljasurnud+A:v˘älʲja%#s˘urnud GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
väljavaadetega+A:v˘älʲja%#vaadetega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
värvi+A:v˘ärvi GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
värvimata+A:v˘ärvimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
väärarenditega+A:v˘äär%#arenditega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Short@väärt+A:@P.Case.Short@v˘äärt GI  "weight: 7 " ; 
vöötidega+A:v˘öötʲidega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@õhevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@õhevil GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
õieli+A:õieli GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@õies+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@õies GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
õigustamata+A:õigustamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
õitsel+A:˘õitsel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
õlekarva+A:õle%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ähmasevõitu+A:ähmase%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@ähmis+A:@P.Case.Ine@˘ähmis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@ängis+A:@P.Case.Ine@˘ängis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
äraarvamata+A:ära%#˘arvamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@ärevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@ärevil GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
ärevuses+A:ärevuses GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ärkvel+A:˘ärkvel GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
ühendamata+A:ühendamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ühestükis+A:ühes%#tükis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ülbevõitu+A:˘ülbe%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
üldistamata+A:ülʲdistamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
üldtunnustatud+A:˘üld%#tunnustatud GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
üldtuntud+A:˘üld%#t˘untud GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
ülejäänud+A:üle%#jäänud GI  "weight: 6 " ; 
ülekantud+A:üle%#k˘antud GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
ülemöödunud+A:üle%#m˘öödunud GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
ümarkantis+A:ümar%#k˘anʲtis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
